Alaska, session 34, HB213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 28.05.068(a) is amended to read: 05 (a) If the department conveys, distributes, or communicates data to be used in 06 a database, index, pointer system, or any other system managed by an entity other than 07 the department [, INCLUDING THE AMERICAN ASSOCIATION OF MOTOR 08 VEHICLE ADMINISTRATORS,] to comply with the requirements of P.L. 109-13, 09 Division B (REAL ID Act of 2005), the department may not convey, distribute, or 10 communicate to that entity any data not required to be conveyed, distributed, or 11 communicated for the state to be certified by the United States Department of 12 Homeland Security to be in compliance with the requirements of P.L. 109-13, 13 Division B (REAL ID Act of 2005). 14 * Sec. 2. AS 28.05.068(b) is amended to read: 01 (b) Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the department may [NOT] convey, 02 distribute, or communicate data to a private entity only [ANY SCANNED OR 03 STORED DOCUMENTS COLLECTED IN ORDER] to carry out the provisions of 04 AS 28.15.151(g) [AS 28.15]. 05 * Sec. 3. AS 28.15.151 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 06 (g) The department shall, upon request, furnish information maintained by the 07 department under this section to a nonprofit organization or governmental or tribal 08 entity approved by the United States Social Security Administration to facilitate 09 driver's license data verification. In this subsection, "nonprofit organization" means an 10 organization that qualifies for exemption from taxation under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) or 11 (4) (Internal Revenue Code). 12 * Sec. 4. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.